Hawaii, session 2026, SB616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that motor vehicles that are unregistered, uninspected, or illegally parked are persistent problems for Hawaii's communities.  These vehicles often block residents' access and occupy the State's increasingly few free parking spaces.  Any unnecessary delays in removing these motor vehicles adversely affect law-abiding residents of the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of transportation and each county police department to immediately have towed any parked motor vehicle that is not properly registered, fails to display a valid safety inspection sticker, or is illegally parked. SECTION 2.  Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part XI to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§291C- Towing for certain traffic violations; required.  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department of transportation and county police departments shall immediately cause to be towed away any parked motor vehicle that: (1)  Is not properly registered; (2)  Fails to display a valid safety inspection sticker; or (3)  Is parked in violation of any state traffic law." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________